Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.150

Payment of assessment—Record of.

Whenever before the sale of any property the amount of any assessment thereon, with interest, penalty, costs and charges accrued thereon, shall be paid to the treasurer, he or she shall thereon mark the same paid with the date of payment thereof on the assessment roll.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4142; 1963 c 4 s 36.88.150. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 15.]